Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-4,139
Commercial motor vehicle; nonresident; operating privilege.

Any nonresident may operate a commercial motor vehicle upon the highways of this state if:

(1) Such nonresident has in his or her immediate possession a valid commercial driver's license or a valid commercial learner's permit issued by his or her state of residence or by a jurisdiction with standards that are in accord with 49 C.F.R. parts 383 and 391;

(2) The license or permit is not suspended, revoked, or canceled;

(3) Such nonresident is not disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle;

(4) The commercial motor vehicle is not operated in violation of any downgrade; and

(5) Such nonresident does not have a status of prohibited in the federal Drug and Alcohol Clearinghouse.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 89;

Laws 2001, LB 108, § 2;

Laws 2006, LB 853, § 10;

Laws 2011, LB178, § 10;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 25;

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 35.